Utah statutes.
17B-2a-1006.   Limits on water conservancy district property tax levy --
Additional levy.
(1)  Except as provided in Subsection (2) and subject to Subsection (3), the
property tax levy of a water conservancy district for all purposes may not
exceed:
(a)  .0001 per dollar of taxable value of taxable property in the district,
before the earliest of:
(i)  the planning or design of works;
(ii)  the acquisition of the site or right-of-way on which the works will be
constructed; or
(iii)  the commencement of construction of the works; and
(b)  .0002 per dollar of taxable value of taxable property in the district,
after the earliest of the events listed in Subsection (1)(a).
(2)  Notwithstanding Subsection (1) and subject to Subsection (3):
(a)  in a district that contains land located within the Lower Colorado River
Basin, the levy after the earliest of the events listed in Subsection (1)(a)
may be increased to a maximum of .001 per dollar of taxable value of taxable
property in the district; and
(b)  in a district to be served under a contract, water appropriation, water
allotment, or otherwise by water apportioned by the Colorado River Compact to
the Upper Basin, the levy after the earliest of the events listed in
Subsection (1)(a) may be increased to a maximum of .0004 per dollar of taxable
value of taxable property.
(3)  Notwithstanding the limits on the rate of property tax levies under
Subsections (1) and (2), a water conservancy district may impose an additional
property tax levy, not to exceed .0001 per dollar of taxable value of taxable
property in the district, if the additional levy is necessary to provide
adequate funds to pay maturing bonds or other debts of the district.
